Missouri, session 2026, HB2823.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 260.283, RSMo, is repealed, to read as follows:
[260.283. 1. All merchants, itinerant vendors, and peddlers doing
business in this state shall have the option to provide customers either a paper
or a plastic bag for the packaging of any item or good purchased, provided
such purchase is of a size and manner commensurate with the use of paper and
plastic bags.
2. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no political subdivision
shall impose any ban, fee, or tax upon the use of either paper or plastic bags for
packaging of any item or good purchased from a merchant, itinerant vendor, or
peddler. No political subdivision shall prohibit a consumer from using a
reusable bag for the packaging of any item or good purchased from a
merchant, itinerant vendor, or peddler.]
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.